Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3723
County
Visitors Promotion Fund; collection; administrative fee.

The
amount the Tax Commissioner shall remit, as taxes collected for a County Visitors
Promotion Fund, shall be reduced by three percent as an administrative fee
necessary to defray the cost of collecting the tax and the expenses incident
to such collection.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1261;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 23.